South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3307.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 2, Chapter 12, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-12-15.  Notwithstanding another provision of law, cable service providers must issue a pro rata refund to customers due to an interruption in cable service within fourteen days of the interruption in service. Noncompliance with the section results in a find to the cable service provider in the amount of ten thousand dollars per day. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----